List of JDs:- 
----------------------------------

1) link :-https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-lead-digital-product-manager-wells-fargo-india-solutions-pvt-ltd-bengaluru-9-to-12-years-190624502267?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=1&px=1
Job description

As a Product Owner for one of our Customer Service Management (CSM) scrums, you will support the evolution and implementation of key CSM capabilities that transform the Wells Fargo customer service experience. In this role, you will be responsible for collaborating with our Product Management and line of business (LOB) partners and leading your scrum team to deliver solutions via Agile methodology. To be successful in this role, you must be a strong team player with exceptional interpersonal and communications skills, who thrives as an independent contributor, yet is able to leverage your leadership acumen to build credibility and direct matrixed resources in a fast-paced and constantly evolving environment.

Responsibilities:

Partner with product manager and project team to define business requirements to meet the project objectives. Ensure requirements are within our business standards and guidelines and align to our business strategy and objectives.

Communicates, collaborates and negotiates with key stakeholders in business & technology teams
Manage, groom, and prioritize the scrum s backlog and work with the team to plan stories for upcoming sprints. Determines acceptance criteria for final UAT code.
Be accountable for scrum team deliverables and KPIs. Monitor and measure progress on user story delivery and sprint team velocity. Review metrics to measure value and identify opportunities for improvement.
Effectively manage risks associated with projects and scrum team, including: compliance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations; and adherence to internal Wells Fargo policies, procedures, and controls
Look at industry trends and customer feedback to brainstorm on features.
Communicate, collaborate and negotiate with key stakeholders (e.g. Value Stream Leader, LOB, Legal, Compliance, etc.)
Obtain appropriate buy-in on difficult decisions and solve complex issues, especially when there isn t agreement amongst stakeholders, knowing how to negotiate and when to escalate to his/her leaders
Work with operations and technical teams to research and resolve production issues. Clarify ambiguities and customer experience based on business requirements and product objectives.
:

Essential Skills:

7+ years of experience in one or a combination of the following: digital customer experience, digital product/program management, digital platforms, or digital consulting with overall experience of 12+ years
Experience in Customer Experience / Customer Service design principles
Knowledge and understanding of Financial services and Banking industry. Knowledge of US Banking industry will be an added advantage.
Experience in product management/development, program management, strategy, marketing and/or related position in a consumer-oriented, technology-dependent environment in financial services or related industries
Ability to partner effectively with multiple stakeholders in Business & Technology teams like Architecture, Line of Business, Information Security, and Application Developers/SMEs while developing technical solutions to business problems
Experience writing Business Requirements Documents (BRD), Functional Specification Documents(FSD), JIRA Epics and User Stories
Ability to facilitate design sessions, gather and document functional and technical requirements and articulate complex concepts in a clear manner
Ability to manage process discovery, process modeling, and process improvement activities with strong process improvement mindset
Strong analytical skills with high attention to detail and accuracy along with ability to synthesize complex analytical findings into executive level communications
Ability to synthesize data to form a story and align information to contrast or compare to industry perspective and historical business trends
Ability to work effectively in a team environment and across all organizational levels, where flexibility, collaboration, and adaptability are important
Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills
Solid creative and strategic thinking skills
Agile and Jira experience in large, regulated organizations
Technical skills & Certifications

Microsoft Office (Excel / PowerPoint / Word / MS Visio)
Collaboration & Work Management tools like JIRA, Confluence etc.
Product Management and Certified Product Owner / Scrum Master certifications are added advantage

2)
link ;- https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-manager-4-product-management-engineering-western-digital-bengaluru-6-to-10-years-140624500111?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=2&px=1
Job description
Creating and managing the integrated program schedule by working with cross functional teams.

Escalating key issues and present options for resolution to the cross-functional executive teams.

Lead the development and operations teams in planning, prioritizing and executing product qualification and successful product ramps.

Driving the Product Life Cycle process compliance by ensuring phase checklist compliance and coordinating phase reviews, and provide enterprise-wide product development status information at weekly intervals.

Publishing monthly metrics on actual performance to commitments.

High level strategic decision making through detailed analysis and material preparations.

Role: Product Manager
Industry Type: Electronic Components / Semiconductors
Department: Product Management
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Product Management - Technology

3)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-manager-digital-product-caterpillar-india-private-ltd-chennai-bengaluru-8-to-9-years-140624500407?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=3&px=1
Job description
The Product Manager s primary task is to create and manage the Product Roadmap and Backlog and to ensure everyone knows the priorities of the Product. The Product Manager is empowered to make all decisions regarding the Technical Product Backlog.
Responsible for maximizing the value of the product and the work of the Development Team
Responsible for acting as Product Manager for larger, more complex projects with high value to the organization.
Responsible for creating, maintaining and prioritizing the Product Backlog according to business value for the life of the project.
Communicate Product Backlog priorities to the team.
Act as the key decision-maker regarding what features the product will have.
Responsible for product vision and conveying that vision to the team.
Owns definition of acceptance criteria for product features.
Work closely with key stakeholders throughout the organization.
Responsible for making decisions on release dates and content.
Represent the customer, interfacing and engaging with the customer.
Communicates releases to stakeholder and customers.
Employee is also responsible for performing other job duties as assigned by Caterpillar management from time to time.

4)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-manager-digital-product-management-american-express-company-bengaluru-3-to-8-years-130624501012?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=5&px=1
Job description
The successful candidate must have experience managing complex initiatives and go-to-market strategies while thriving in a multi-workstream environment. Success in this role will be defined by the ability to coordinate and having expert management of stakeholders and teams spanning varying disciplines and geographies. Critical thinking is required to elevate the role and team to its next iteration.
 
Responsibilities:
Leading implementation of various features & capabilities for the Amex mobile apps (iOS & Android) in International, and longer term, website.
Bringing US digital features to the International markets, to solve local business needs and help central & local goals.
Partnering with a locally based engineering team for all elements of the development cycle, user story creation & leading ceremonies (Grooming, standup, retros etc )
Leading & supporting ceremonies with our engineering partners, actively contributing towards the backlog, ensuring our engineering partners have requisite detail to interpret user-stories & success criteria.
Driving market requirement gathering & inputs managing ingestion of market inputs into delivery platforms/processes and roadmap.
Supporting & validating technical requirements for capability and platform integrations.
Participation in strategic development process, and self identified opportunity understanding platform limitations & opportunities to ensure our app & web experiences remain a market-leading product across the world
Maintaining product documentation & management tools for all features developed, and supporting broader team documentation.
Improving ways of working through product operations and maximising efficiencies driving automation throughout all mobile disciplines.
Some degree of flexibility with working hours will be required as part of the role to partner with colleagues in other geographies (US & UK primarily)
Leadership and mentorship of 1-2 direct reports and helping bring through the next generation of product managers.
Qualifications
Experience in product management, mobile applications/web development, product operations & agile ceremonies.
People leadership - This role will have between 1 and 2 associate product manager direct reports, locally based. Someone who is able to coach and instil best practices of product management will be vital.
Collaborative our role is largely partnership driven; working with product managers, local market teams & technology partners is vital.
Technically minded & resourceful with an appreciation of how to develop mobile & web features.
Proactive and enthusiastic self-starter with a strong affinity to bring projects to a close quickly.
Strategic thinker ability to see both the big picture and the details and to translate business requirements into actionable features and delivery plan.
Optimiser being able to identify efficiencies and new ways of working to achieve greater economies of scale for feature development.
Detail oriented active involvement in backlog development requires a process-driven mindset with a strong attention to detail and ability to manage details in an environment with changing priorities.
Strong communicator we're looking for someone who will speak up and proactively contribute to all conversations.
Strong multitasker and someone who enjoys a wide variety of challenges each day. This role has many different aspects that the successful candidate will need to manage simultaneously. Priorities and workload will be fluid.
Additional languages spoken not a necessity, but valuable to have.
Benefits include:
Competitive base salaries
Bonus incentives
Support for financial-we'll-being and retirement
Comprehensive medical, dental, vision, life insurance, and disability benefits (depending on location)
Flexible working model with hybrid, onsite or virtual arrangements depending on role and business need
Generous paid parental leave policies (depending on your location)
Free access to global on-site we'llness centers staffed with nurses and doctors (depending on location)
Free and confidential counseling support through our Healthy Minds program
Career development and training opportunities

5) link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-sr-technical-product-manager-visa-inc-bengaluru-4-to-15-years-130624500179?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=6&px=1
Job description
The candidate should have a very strong technical background in Payments space, should be a thought leader, be very familiar & abreast with recent industry development in Financial services and card payments industry space, have exceptional organizational skills, written and verbal communication skills and be an analytical and structured thinker. This individual must be able to think broadly about Visa business and drive the expansion of the Visa Merchant Acquiring and Processing Cybersource Payments platform.

The right candidate should possess a strong Technical Product Management background, with demonstrated expertise in contributing to medium to large cross-functional projects. We are looking for candidates who have demonstrated excellence as Technical Product Manager in the payments, internet or related industries. The successful candidate must be a hands-on person with proven ability to engage in high bandwidth conversations with both business and technology executives.

To be successful in this position, this individual must be highly effective working both independently and in cross-functional capacities to identify, define, analyze, prioritize and refine technology requirements across all categories. Successful candidates will be skilled at forging strong partnerships with business sponsors, product owners, architects, and developers to define feature sets, story maps, detailed user stories (functional and non-functional) to support the development process. This function will address bottlenecks, provide escalation management, anticipate and make tradeoffs, balance the business needs versus technical constraints to maximize business benefit.

Beyond the design and planning stages of the development lifecycle, strong Agile expertise is required to collaborate with Scrum teams and communicate requirements to development teams for execution and implementation.

This role will also partner with the cross-functional leadership team to help define the roadmap priorities and ensure that it remains aligned with the broader strategy and priorities. This individual will foster innovation, collaboration, leverage new technologies and champion impactful change to build Visa technology brand through internal and external initiatives.

This is a hybrid position. Hybrid employees can alternate time between both remote and office. Employees in hybrid roles are expected to work from the office 2-3 set days a week (determined by leadership/site), with a general guidepost of being in the office 50% or more of the time based on business needs.

6)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-tracxn-associate-product-manager-b2b-saas-product-0-3-yrs-tracxn-bangalore-bengaluru-0-to-3-years-120624006650?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=9&px=1
Job description
About Tracxn:

Tracxn (www.tracxn.com) is a Bangalore-based product company providing a research and deal sourcing platform for Venture Capital, Private Equity, Corp Dev, and professionals working around the startup Ecosystem.

We are a team of 600+ working professionals serving customers across the globe. Our clients include Funds like Andreessen Horowitz, Matrix Partners,GGV Capital and Large Corporates such as Citi,Embraer & Ferrero.


About the Role:

[Important] : This is an entry-level position.

The Associate Product Manager is responsible for working closely with the Product Managers to plan and execute throughout the product life-cycle. You will be part of the product management team who will be responsible for planning and driving the product vision and strategy of one of the leading data platforms used in the Investment Industry.

This is an entry-level role and as you grow, you will be closely working with the senior team members to venture into a PM role.

As an Associate Product Manager in a data-centric company, the ability to build cases supported by data is essential. While training will be provided, the candidate should be able to demonstrate comfort with understanding basic coding principles and utilizing API tools like Postman to extract and analyze data.


Key Responsibilities :

- Assist PMs in defining feature specifications

- Writing product requirement documents

- Review and Report on Key Performance Indicators

- Collaborate with UX team to create designs and wireframes

- Manage the day-to-day operations in the product life cycle


Please apply if you have :

- 0 to 3 years of work experience. MBA is not mandatory

- Been a consistent performer throughout your college and career

- Interest in B2B SaaS products

- An understanding and empathy for users

- The ability to structure and analyze ambiguous problems

- The ability to communicate ideas clearly through workflows, feature descriptions etc.

- A desire to build a long-term career in Product Management

7) 
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-ii-flipkart-internet-private-limited-bengaluru-3-to-5-years-110624902834?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=10&px=1
Job description
Product Managers play a pivotal role in leveraging technology for providing an exceptional customer experience.

With the analytical and problem-solving mindset, they get deeper into the function/problem space, work with stakeholders and partners to develop a wider perspective, take an outside-in view of the problems and create a vision, strategy and roadmap of how software can solve immediate needs/wants, setting the stage for the right disruptions/innovations of the future.

Once envisioned, they inspire and align stakeholders - business, operations and finance, and through engineers transform their vision into reality.

Roles & Responsibilities (What youll do):

Drive the product charter with the gamut of the business, responsible for identifying the user needs, defining product constructs and user journeys

Help interpret and define a product vision and strategy.

Work with product leadership to define a product strategy and roadmap

Collaborate with external partner teams, business teams and other cross-functional teams effectively in driving the projects and be the point of contact on the team

Skills Required (What youll need):

Excellent communication, problem-solving, organizational and analytical skills, with the ability to evolve product strategy based on research, data and industry trend

Strong technical abilities with experience working for engineering teams

Ability to thrive in a cross-functional and fast-paced environment

Ready to roll up sleeves to spend time designing UI, analyzing data, setting up quality processes and guardrails, jumping into the business analysis as required

Previous work experience:

3-6 years of experience in product management

Experience in the domain/ sector is good to have.

Education Qualifications:

Post graduation in Management (MBA) or equivalent qualification

8)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-oracle-hyderabad-bengaluru-delhi-ncr-4-to-9-years-110624008945?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=11&px=1
Job description
Job Description :


Work is non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in our area of specialization SaaS delivery of Customer Experience (CX) solutions. This is a leading contributor an architect - individually and as a team member, providing direction and mentoring to others.


BS or BA Business Administration, Accounting; MBA is a plus.
At least 3 years of experience in enterprise software architecture, planning, and implementation. 
Experience in setting IT strategy and leading business organizations through change is desirable.
Experience leading the implementation of enterprise-class, mission-critical applications.
Experience implementing, managing, and utilizing Fusion CX Products or equivalent. 
CRM software and particularly, Oracle Sales Cloud, Siebel, Oracle CRM On Demand, Oracle Netsuite, or SFDC is highly desirable.
Sufficient knowledge of a broad set of SFA, service and service knowledge management processes so as to understand, direct, and communicate the issues between the relevant parties.
Preferably a few years of experience in Cloud (IaaS, PaaS, SaaS, DBaaS, DTaaS, DRaaS, etc.) environments.
Familiarity with the capabilities of modern analytics reporting tools is desirable.
Experience delivering in-person architecture, integration, design, and planning workshops with multiple customer roles – business owner, IT, end-users.

You are someone who:

A team player with strong interpersonal skills.
Has excellent verbal and written communication skills at executive, architect, admin, and end-user levels.
Has strong organizational and process management skills and attention to detail.
Has the credibility and experience (and desire) to engage with customer executives.
Enjoys the challenge of "the unexpected".
Can rapidly sort out "fact from fiction" in any situation and motivate forward progress.
Can work well in a delivery team environment.
Able to quickly garner respect.
Demands a lot from yourself and others with whom you work.
Constantly broadening and deepening your knowledge of the products you work with and your general skills.
Loves helping customers solve business problems with technology.
Open to traveling 30% - 40% of the time.
As part of the team, you will make significant contributions to assist our customers, systems integrators and field service delivery organization through the implementation project while significantly shaping product strategy and growth of our cloud application.

9)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-jio-bengaluru-2-to-5-years-030624009027?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=13&px=1
Job description
Greetings of the day!


Looking for the Product Manager.


Responsibilities

Developing and owning long-term visions, product roadmaps, competitive analysis, market and domain research, and Go-to-Market (GTM) strategies to drive substantial business impact and enhance customer satisfaction within the seller experience and finance domains.
Collaborating seamlessly with cross-functional teams, including Engineers, Designers, Analysts, Business, Operations, and Finance, to foster a cohesive work environment and ensure alignment on strategic goals.
Influencing key stakeholders across various departments to facilitate change management initiatives, driving product and technology adoption within the organization.
Understand business and its nuances, with clarity on how the features they are building affecting the business.
Taking ownership of end-to-end key product metrics throughout the product life cycle, ensuring continuous improvement and alignment with business objectives.
Desired Skills and Experience

2-5 years of product management experience in building and shipping consumer products.
Possess strong customer empathy and strive for customer evangelism.
Keen eye for identifying opportunities for business scale and customer experience improvements.
Should be entrepreneurial and possess strong ownership.
A bachelor's degree or master's degree in a numerically inclined discipline such as Engineering, Economics, Commerce, Mathematics preferably from a premium institute.
MBA degree from premier institute and prior startup experience is preferred but not necessary.
In-depth domain knowledge of seller Management Systems, seller Experience, and finance- related workflows, enabling informed decision-making and strategic planning.
Exceptional problem-solving, critical thinking, and communication skills, combined with the ability to think innovatively and create differentiated solutions in a competitive industry landscape.
Persuasive written and verbal communication skills across diverse functions and teams

Interested can apply here. Looking for immediate joiner only.

10)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-group-product-manager-search-personalization-jio-bengaluru-8-to-11-years-030624008988?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=14&px=1
Job description
Greeting of the day!


Hiring For Group Product Manager: Search & Personalization.


Responsibilities

Own roadmap for all Search and personalization products.
Lead and mentor a team of product managers, providing guidance and support to ensure successful product development and delivery.
Partner with data science teams to leverage machine learning and data analytics for product innovation and optimization.
Ensure seamless integration of data science initiatives into product development, focusing on search, relevance, and personalization.
Collaborate on the development and implementation of data models to improve product functionality and user experience.
Implement personalization strategies to deliver customized user experiences based on data insights and user behavior.
Understand business and its nuances, with clarity on how the features they are building affecting the business.
Desired Skills and Experience

8+ years of product management experience in building and shipping consumer products.
Proven track record of working with data science teams on search, relevance, and personalization projects.
Prior experience in hiring and leading a team of PMs
Possess strong customer empathy and strive for customer evangelism.
Keen eye for identifying opportunities for business scale and customer experience improvements.
Should be entrepreneurial and possess strong ownership.
MBA degree from premier institute and prior startup experience is preferred but not necessary.

Looking for immediate joiner. Interested can apply here.

11)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-network-ibm-india-pvt-limited-bengaluru-10-to-14-years-300524912585?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=15&px=1
Job description



Your Role and Responsibilities
The IBM Cloud Infrastructure organization is looking for an experienced, innovative Offering Manager to join the team responsible for the IBM Cloud Infrastructure portfolio and lead our IBM Cloud Network family of offerings. As an offering manager, you will act as an entrepreneur, strategist, technical visionary, cross-functional team leader, and client advocate. Responsibilities include define and delivering on a differentiated roadmap, building relationships with key stakeholders and internal cross-functional teams including sales, pricing, and engineering to drive offering strategy and execution, and tracking and monitoring the progress, risks, and outcomes of your product deliverables. The ideal candidate will have previous experience in offering or product management and an understanding of the cloud infrastructure market or traditional network hardware and workloads.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Overall 10+ Years' experience
At least 5+ years of experience as a Product Manager in B2B or Cloud businesses (SaaS, PaaS or IaaS products)
Experience as a Product Manager in the past with deep experience in cloud technologies, IT/Network Infrastructure products or services
Strong understanding of multiple aspects of Cloud Networking technologies and products such as, Software defined networking, data-center networking, network connectivity fundamentals, VPC, load balancers, Cloud firewalls, Content Delivery Networks (CDN), etc
Understanding of cloud platforms and cloud buyer journey
Experience in leading cross-org products - Experience with creating presentations and presenting to internal teams, executives and clients.
Must demonstrate consolidated knowledge & experience in Core Network and Cloud deployments
Hands-on, data driven approach and an ability to work concurrently on several projects
Networking domain expertise


Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Knowledge of AWS or Azure IaaS platform
Understanding of building cloud applications in an enterprise environment
Understanding of cloud consumption and technology models such as pricing and utilization
Experience in modern networking trends e.g., Cloud network, SD-WAN, network telemetry, network flow analysis
Experience driving product vision, go-to-market strategy, and design discussions
Knowledge of multiple functional areas such as Product Management, Engineering, UX/UI, Sales, Customer Support, Finance, or Marketing

12)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-product-manager-i-flipkart-internet-private-limited-bengaluru-3-to-5-years-300524004427?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=16&px=1
Job description
About the Role

Product Management at Flipkart is responsible for answering the question of what technology needs to be built to solve a particular business problem at scale. The function is in a great position to define how E-Commerce in India will look like and will also shape the future of supply chain, retail, e-commerce, payments, customer experience/trust etc.

Product Managers are at the helm of all crucial information – be it customer insights or business intelligence. They bend and wield this high-profile career position with proven leadership skills to provide the market knowledge and consumer understanding to reflect and resolve with that wisdom, analysis, and resourcefulness. Product Managers etch our new product features, ward us off if needed, think up a roadmap to support our goals and strategies, and sync together with other platform teams on cross-functional initiatives.

At Flipkart, a high focus on Impact and Ownership allows for freedom for each to experiment and innovate. Pride is when you see the impact of what you have created. The ability to see what your contribution does to the business is a rare experience, add to that the fact that the impact of it is felt by your friends and family in India - the experience is extremely gratifying.


Your Array (Nice To Haves)

Deep Product Thinking to map our goals into roadmaps, new product features, and strategies.
Strong Collaboration skills with which you work with other platform teams on cross-functional initiatives, to drive and implement the product idea you defined and see them through delivery.
Strong Execution in a fast-moving, and sometimes chaotic environment because high personal productivity is your nirvana.
Excellent communication skills that will open new windows of opportunities for our business.
Strong data-driven analytical skills
Dealing with ambiguity - to operate and thrive on partial and still have a track record of building successful teams
You (Must Have)

Understand customer data deeply, and partner with different Flipkart teams to identify new areas to drive down costs using existing and new insights.
Strong tech background with a good understanding of driving integration between systems
Good exposure in the product life cycle and driving execution
Strong communication and evangelization skills to kick off & drive partnerships with other teams
Strong communication and presentation skills. Ability to articulate progress and plans clear to the leadership team and get their feedback
Bachelors in Computer Science or equivalent preferred
Strong program management skills, with ability to manage multiple stakeholders at various levels.
About the team

The Accounting Product team has the following key priorities (1) Lead the overall Financial Reporting and Hygiene for Flipkart (2) Invest heavily in platformization constructs in Accounting (3) Ensure BAU efforts on Payouts, Invoicing, Taxation, and MEC continue to remain stable and drive faster execution in Strategic Programs (4) Extend Accounting stack to other group companies like Myntra, Jabong, FK Wholesale and set it up for Externalisation.

13)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-servicenow-itsm-manager-hp-india-bengaluru-7-to-10-years-280524906427?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=19&px=1
Job description
Job Summary
This role is responsible for defining, planning, and executing the product strategy, collaborating with various teams to deliver software solutions that delight customers and meet business goals. The role plans and manages technical programs or projects, effectively steering them to meet specific roadmap and feature objectives. The role develops a comprehensive software vision and roadmap for product initiatives.

A large portion of the duties of this role will be performing as ITSM ServiceNow capabilities and Business Process Engineer (BPE).

As ITSM ServiceNow capabilities lead - you will be in charge of defining & designing new capabilities/services that will be developed on HP Services ITSM platform. At the core of this job, grooming user stories, worming with Architects and development teams to ensure a good understanding of the capabilities requested, validate/test stories, drive adoption/management of change.

Once the capability is in operation, you will be in charge of enhancements as well as deep technical expertise support.

The process engineering role involves thinking process. BPEs draws inferences from process details and link these inferences to the big picture by considering business objectives in identifying process improvements and the creation of new processes.A Business Process Engineer typically has the ability to structure a large amount of information within a process framework.

In fact, the BPE will work with the Global Service Delivery team , engage with other services organizations and other HPI entities (RBUs/GBUs) to find the best way to design new digital workflows that will translate into a set of capabilities in HP ITSM ; as well solve existing service delivery agent and workflow process-related problems. This will often involve analysing existing processes and designing improved ones. BPE will be required to interpret business requirements, holding meetings, researching processes, collecting data, analyzing information and performing related tasks.

Next, to the BPE responsibilities, the individual must be able to act as a Project/Program Manager, providing direction to team activities and facilitates information validation and team decision-making process. The projects are usually cross-organizational - affecting two or three Business Units. Aside from that, The individual will need to coordinate and integrate the work efforts and deliverables of a multi-function project team related to the execution of complex projects within the Managed Services business of HP Inc.

Responsibilities

Leads through the entire product development cycle, ensuring quality and delivery.
Collaborates closely with engineering, design, and other relevant teams to ensure the successful development and delivery of high-quality software solutions on time and within scope.
Strategically partners with stakeholders to understand needs and processes
Translates complex market and stakeholder needs into product requirements and definitions.
Translates customer feedback and assesses the external environment to identify potential changes that could enhance the differentiated product roadmap.
Provides thought leadership to stakeholders to guide feature development and prioritization.
Translates user requirements into executable and workable feature items with the software engineering team.
Provides guidance for junior team members on product management strategies.
Tracks and reports key metrics to drive future product developments.
Advises key stakeholders on the portfolio strategy across all phases of the lifecycle.
SME on HP ITSM ServiceNow capabilities - deep understanding of workflows, fundamental data and possible configurations
Write stories for future capabilities development, Run Test, Plan for enhancements
Education & Experience Recommended

Four-year or Graduate Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Information Systems, or any other related discipline or commensurate work experience or demonstrated competence.
Typically has 7-10 years of work experience, preferably in product management, digital or software product development, or a related field.
Knowledge & Skills

Agile Methodology
ITIL and Service Management tooling
Automation
JIRA
Kanban Principles
Lean Manufacturing
Milestones (Project Management)
New Product Development
Process Improvement
Product Management
Project Management
Project Planning
Risk Management
Scrum (Software Development)
Cross-Org Skills

Effective Communication
Results Orientation
Learning Agility
Digital Fluency
Customer Centricity
Impact & Scope

Impacts function and leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives.
Complexity

Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors.
Shift -

No shift premium (India)

14)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-product-manager-oracle-bengaluru-4-to-9-years-270524004997?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671&xp=20&px=1
Job description
Oracle Field Service manages personnel, parts, and equipment to meet SLA requirements, empowering workers for both depot and field tasks through a unified offline-capable mobile app. It enhances worker productivity, asset uptime and lifespan, leveraging supply chain processes such as inventory tracking and warranties to improve KPIs for critical 24/7 operations.

We are looking for a hustler! Someone who challenges the status quo based on the strong analytical and data-driven skills with an understanding of the strategic initiatives that drive the most business value. 


This is a fast-paced multi-task environment where quick decisions and fast actions drive the success. 


Articulate a clear product vision and help define the product roadmap.
Define and execute strategies to drive revenue growth.
Conduct research and analysis to identify market trends, solution positioning and opportunities.
Sales strategy and enablement: Collaborate with the different sales team across all regions and industries. Collaborate with the outbound product team to develop value propositions and messaging to help creating winning strategies.
Lead and pipeline management: Develop and implement strategies to help sales generate the leads and optimize the sales pipeline based on the growth objectives
Reporting and analytics: Define KPIs to measure and track success of the growth initiatives.
Launches and campaigns: Plan, coordinate and execute targeted internal and external campaigns. 

15)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-siemens-limited-bengaluru-5-to-8-years-250424501782?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=1&px=2
Job description
Create and activate a roadmap towards becoming an insight-driven organization.
Conduct research and analyzing customer needs to identify opportunities for new products and features.
Sets product visions and strategies for the data products and solutions by gaining a thorough understanding of internal customer needs.
Drive growth, identify goals and metrics, provide guidance on design, and support successful delivery of product management practices.
Collaborate with designers, developers, and data teams, stay up to date with industry trends, and monitor product performance.
Resolves issues within or across product teams that may impair teams from delivery of a quality product to meet strategic, financial, and technical goals.

Job Requirements/ Skills:
At least 5 years of experience as a product manager, deep domain expertise, knowledge of databases and SQL, and fluency in English.
Proficient in data analysis, with the ability to extract insights from large datasets using tools like SQL, Python, and R.
Strong technical background, with knowledge of databases, APIs, and cloud platforms like AWS.
Deep understanding of customer needs and the ability to translate those needs into product features and enhancements.
Possess agile product planning & execution skills and tools. Examples: JIRA, road mapping, business case development and budgeting.
Behavioral Competencies:
High energy level, sense of urgency and intellectual curiosity, confident, thorough, not afraid to make decisions, oriented toward practical solutions. Passion for developing great products!
Confident, without an ego, to have both the conviction and willingness to make decisions as well as the confidence to seek collaborative solutions.
Ability to overcome setbacks and enthusiastically persist until ambitious goals are achieved must be resourceful, creative, and innovative.

16)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-healthcare-infosys-limited-bengaluru-9-to-14-years-200524906061?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=3&px=2
Job description
Responsibilities
As a Senior Product Manager you will be pivotal to creating roadmap, owning release plan for multiple capabilities that is futuristic and meets industry and client needs. You will be responsible for continuous backlog management, prioritizing the backlog considering the needs and objectives of every stakeholder. As a thought leader in your business domain, bring in industry best practices, learnings from client demos and interactions into designing. You will anchor business pursuit initiatives, sales demo. You will have the opportunity to shape the Infosys platform that enables payers and providers to deliver better care.

Technical and Professional Requirements:
Payer/ Provider/ PBM organizations
Product Management/Product Engineering /Healthcare Operations
Experience working with industry leading Enrollment, Claims, Billing or EHR systems.
Managing product lifecycle in whole from ideation, exploration, approval, development, implementation, measurement, and ongoing development.
Expertise in US Government Program Line of Business - Medicare, Medicaid, Duals, Marketplace
Plan Sponsor & Product, Enrollment & Billing, Provider Data Management, Provider Network Management, Claims, Encounters, Medicare, and Marketplace Risk Adjustment.
Developing results-oriented strategies to solve complex and open-ended business problems.
Market Analysis and Product fitment
Communicating and facilitating architecture design discussions/decisions and impacts to key stakeholders.
Customer success on managing customer engagements and requirements.
Leading business pursuits and product demonstrations.
Agile Product Development Methodology

Preferred Skills:
Domain->Healthcare->Healthcare - ALL
Technology->Analytics - Functional->Business Analyst

Additional Responsibilities:
Experience in market leading healthcare products (key emphasis).
Proven track record of at least 8 years in software product management roles.
Capability/Feature planning and design, manage the specifications of their development, and monitor their on-going operation to better understand customer experiences.
Clearly communicating progress towards delivery, technical challenges that may occur.
Act as a thought leader and subject matter expert in the assigned product area, develop essential product documentation including business case, business requirements and use cases.
Own product backlog and collaborate closely with the platform engineering team.
Create Journey Maps that re-imagine/re-define the healthcare problematic process areas.
Understanding of trends affecting customer adoption.
Experience of working with enterprise customers, both technical and business, and at all levels.
Influence leaders in diverse functional areas
Strong business acumen including experience in estimation and pricing, market research.
Demonstrated ability to navigate ambiguity and adapt quickly to modern technology and processes.
Strong analytical ability with exposure to data science and automation
Teaming/Collaboration - Demonstrates exceptional leadership and team management skills, with a collaborative and empowering approach to achieve results through influence.
Excellent communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills to develop lasting relationships with senior business or technical leaders with the highest levels of business acumen and technical expertise.

Educational Requirements
MTech,MBA,BTech,Bachelor of Engineering

Service Line
Application Development and Maintenance
* Location of posting is subject to business requirements
Role: Product Manager
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Product Management
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Product Management - Technology
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Production/Industrial
PG: MBA/PGDM in Marketing

17)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-bangalore-kpmg-assurance-and-consulting-services-llp-bengaluru-6-to-11-years-190524003875?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=5&px=2
Job description
About KPMG in India
KPMG entities in India are professional services firm(s). These Indian member firms are affiliated with KPMG International Limited. KPMG was
established in India in August 1993. Our professionals leverage the global network of firms, and are conversant with local laws, regulations, markets
and competition. KPMG has offices across India in Ahmedabad, Bengaluru, Chandigarh, Chennai, Gurugram, Jaipur, Hyderabad, Jaipur, Kochi,
Kolkata, Mumbai, Noida, Pune, Vadodara and Vijayawada.
KPMG entities in India offer services to national and international clients in India across sectors. We strive to provide rapid, performance-based,
industry-focused and technology-enabled services, which reflect a shared knowledge of global and local industries and our experience of the Indian
business environment.


Product Manager
Bangalore
The Product Manager is accountable for the value delivery of the product to the business. He or she collaborates with the Product Owner to set the
product vision, brings forward the best technology/solutions to solve business problems (e.g. technology and innovation funnels), co[1]creates the
product roadmap and success metrics, fulfills the product lifecycle within Enterprise compliance and controls framework, creates value delivery
through product development, performs financial management, and sets the right product environment and mindset for the product team.
• Sets the direction for the product line aligned to business vision and agreed KPIs
• Manages senior level stakeholders for the product across RDS to ensure tight orchestration,
early warning on new requirements and early warning on potential unmet needs and
problems.
• Provides technology/innovation advisory towards lines of businesses that the product line
supports to ensure that right innovative technologies are offered as possible ideas to solve
complex business problems
• Builds and leads the product teams under the product line
• Promotes design thinking, agile and lean start up to create MVPs within the product line • Focuses on maximizing the adoption of high-impact digitalization
• Finds the optimal adoption mix of new and emerging propositions vs tried and tested capabilities
• Accelerates maturation and replication of the available digital technology propositions at scale
• Guides product line build or buy decisions and enables the process of investment decision[1]making across products within the product line
• Drives fulfilment of the product lifecycle across the product line through teams of properly
skilled product managers and multi-disciplinary teams. Own and drive the delivery plan in
line with the product lifecycle aligning with other PLMs within the IT business portfolio to
assure lean product development across the full product value stream and fulfilment of the
target IT Strategic Plan.
• Drives rigour in KPI fulfilment through investment discipline across the product lifecycle by
product managers within the product line. Aggregate reporting for the product line through
available IT business management tools transparency of product line performance against
agreed critical success factors.
• Elevates product manager awareness and compliance to agreed Enterprise technology and
data standards, acting as escalation point in instances of divergence for avoidance of
technical debt.
• Works tightly with IT Managers and other Product Line Managers across the IT business
portfolio to enable the agreed business face-up model and drive alignment on Business IT
approaches towards other IT functional lines and into the business across the product
lifecycle. Speak as confidently to technical teams about product development as to
commercial stakeholders about complex product line challenges.
• Demonstrates deep understanding of and proximity to business owners and consumers of
the product line's outputs (internal and/or external). Drive heavy use of business owner and
consumer insights to inform product vision and actionable roadmaps, bringing additional
business domain knowledge and external perspectives into products within the product line.
• Champions use of product data and aggregated product line insights across respective
product roadmaps within the product line.
• Builds, leads, and inspires a team to deliver the Product roadmap against the prevailing
lifecycle, sourcing capability from across the organisation. Focus actions against product
attributes of desirability, feasibility, and viability.
• Manages the product team of their day-to-day delivery accountabilities
Equal employment opportunity information
KPMG India has a policy of providing equal opportunity for all applicants and employees regardless of their color, caste, religion, age, sex/gender,national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability or other legally protected status. KPMG India values
diversity and we request you to submit the details below to support us in our endeavor for diversity. Providing the below information is voluntary
and refusal to submit such information will not be prejudicial to you.

Role: Product Manager
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Product Management
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Product Management - Technology
Education
PG: Any Postgraduate

18)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-senior-product-manager-biochemistry-merck-ltd-bengaluru-6-to-9-years-160524501272?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=6&px=2
Job description
We are looking for a talented and experienced Global Senior Product Manager to join our Biochemistry team within the Chemistry Franchise, to drive the growth for our Detergents product line

As a critical member of our team, you will be responsible for portfolio strategy, innovation, and driving sustainable sales growth and ensuring profitability of the portfolio
You will be a significant contributor to driving growth in four key areas: Product Line Performance:Manages entire product lifecycle; including identifying opportunities, planning product development, launching, monitoring performance, and product obsolescence
Assess key markets, technology trends, customer needs, and competitors
Investigate revenue growth drivers and identify opportunities across workflows and customer segments
Monitor and optimize existing product business including understanding sales/growth trends and product profitability trends
Partner with Commercial colleagues, marketing Communications, and Digital Marketing to develop and execute marketing tactics and commercial tools from an end-user perspectiveConduct regular analysis of portfolio pricing, including price position vs competition across geographies to develop pricing strategies
Drive execution of pricing strategies and monitor profitability impacts
New Product Development and Expansion:Drive innovation with emphasis on sustainable and greener alternative productsAct as a business lead within cross-functional teams on all relevant projects
Set appropriate direction and priority for new product launch plans
Product Sustainability Supply:Lead a cross-functional team to improve the supply chain needs for commercial requirements of the portfolio
Monitor supply chain performance and provide guidance for improvement
Portfolio Positioning Development and Go-to-Market Priorities:Partner with Commercial colleagues and Marketing Communications to ensure optimal sales mix across channels
Develop web activities, tools, and content for products and product categories
Who You Are:Minimum Qualifications:Bachelor s Degree in biology, biochemistry, molecular biology, chemistry, or related scientific discipline
6+ years of demonstrated expertise and knowledge in the Laboratory Life Science market
Ability to travel domestically and/or internationally, up to 20% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:M Sc, MBA, or PhD
6+ years in product management, sales, marketing, and/or supply chain role within the Laboratory Life Science market
Demonstrated understanding of financial principles, financial analysis, technology and market analysisExperience working across organizational lines to translate opportunities into financial business plans
Strong interpersonal and leadership skills with the ability to engage across management team and various functions within the organization
Proficiency in English and Microsoft Office Suite

19)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-lead-product-management-zs-associates-bengaluru-4-to-7-years-140624501409?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=7&px=2
Job description
As a product management lead, you will guide the development and strategic direction of innovative AI solutions, including generative AI agents and apps. You will manage the full product lifecycle, ensuring our offerings not only meet but exceed market demands and customer expectations.
 
You will:
Craft and execute detailed product roadmaps that align with the company s vision, influenced by deep market analysis and ongoing stakeholder feedback
Act as the primary liaison between internal teams (customer success, engineering and product management function) and external customers to gather feedback and ensure product goals meet market and user requirements
Partner with UI teams to create compelling, user-first designs that drive engagement and differentiate our products in the market
Direct agile teams with a focused, clear approach, managing product backlogs, sprint planning, and iterative feedback loops to deliver value swiftly
Keep a pulse on emerging AI trends and technologies, steering product innovation to maintain our competitive edge and meet futuristic market needs
Participate in scrum meetings to provide clarity on requirements and acceptance criteria at requirement level
Work with client teams to get an agreement on scope of changes and enhancements to existing products
Must be able to explain design decisions to their peers and articulate the advantages and risks of their decisions to senior managers
Must be able to give demo of the product to client teams when required
Qualifications
 
ZS welcomes candidates with degrees in computer science, electrical engineering, mathematics or a related discipline. Additionally, we seek individuals with the following qualifications:
Education: bachelors degree in computer science, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, or related field.
Professional Experience: Minimum of 7 years in roles such as Data Scientist, Business Analyst, or Product Owner, with a focus on AI technologies.
Skills:

Strong analytical, problem-solving, and technical skills.
Proven organizational and product management capabilities.
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, effective in multinational team settings.
Proficiency in agile methodologies and product management tools.
This role offers the opportunity to be at the forefront of AI technology innovation, in an environment that values creativity and forward-thinking. You will have the chance to make significant impacts, driving the future of AI applications and enhancing how businesses and consumers interact with technology.
Perks & Benefits:
ZS offers a comprehensive total rewards package including health and we'll-being, financial planning, annual leave, personal growth and professional development. Our robust skills development programs, multiple career progression options and internal mobility paths and collaborative culture empowers you to thrive as an individual and global team member.We are committed to giving our employees a flexible and connected way of working. A flexible and connected ZS allows us to combine work from home and on-site presence at clients/ZS offices for the majority of our week. The magic of ZS culture and innovation thrives in both planned and spontaneous face-to-face connections.

20)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-oracle-unifier-oracle-bengaluru-5-to-10-years-040624010436?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=8&px=2
Job description
The focus of the Product Manager will be to act in a way to not simply deliver features but instead understand problems, collaboratively solving problems, and delivering solutions that customers love and use based on Unifier.  Like the Senior Manager, you will be measured on key KPIs including not just financial & ROI, but also adoption and satisfaction metrics for solutions.  In other words, do customer use the solution and do they like it.


Job description:


We are looking for an energetic and talented individual to be a pivotal member of the Unifier Product Management team with a focus on delivering Industry Solutions based on Unifier.

The focus of the Product Manager will be to act in a way to not simply deliver features” but instead understand problems, collaboratively solving problems, and delivering solutions that customers love and use.  Like the Senior Manager, you will be measured on key KPIs including not just financial & ROI, but also adoption and satisfaction metrics for solutions.  In other words, do customer use the solution and do they like it.

You will drive for consistency, a culture of delivery and customer satisfaction, with 5 key measures:

Adoption “Are people using it?”
Customer Satisfaction “Do they like it?”
Financial “Are they buying it?”
ROI “Are we making money?”
Employee satisfaction “Are we aligned?”

Key Responsibilities 


This is a position that requires a combination of strong engagement and communication skills, pragmatic thinking, tactical execution and the ability to balance an ever challenging mix of priorities and stakeholder views.    You will be collaborating with your Senior Manager, Product Strategy, pre-Sales, Product Marketing, and internal teams focused on industry verticals to deliver solutions that grow the business.


Key responsibilities include:


Configure, maintain and enhance the industry solutions based on Unifier.
Develop custom reports and dashboards for industry solutions.
Understand the customer and their needs and is their advocate 
Understand the market, customers and product management strategy and convey these contexts to the team.
Work with your manager for the creation, management and prioritisation of a product backlog, and for assessing what is appropriate to release to market
Communicate with and get buy in from key stakeholders on product strategy, including external (our customers) and internal. Continue to make development, marketing, support and importantly sales and pre-sales feel good about your stream’s offerings and direction.
Make decisions based on specific and deep market and metrics analysis. 
Work with the Senior Manager to measure and report on the success of your solutions, particularly around adoption and satisfaction.
Ensure that what we build adds up to meaningful experiences for our customers
Plan ahead over 3-5 sprints and monitor progress during sprints. Resolve with stakeholder input any ambiguities and conflicts with other existing or new functionality. 
Ensure customer facing departments understand the changes we make to our products  
Gather feedback to improve our solutions 
Be subject matter experts in our products 
Proactively contribute to ongoing process improvement and ensure high quality outcomes for our customers
Review and contribute to user documentation as a part of our release to market processes
Pro-active in helping others through building capability and supporting peers.
The Product Manager will be a flexible, results-oriented, and experienced product management professional.  This role combines a great instinct for developing compelling products with a strong focus on users; a technical aptitude to work with a world class development team; and the business sense to drive product goals and strategies. 

Commercial 

Assist the Senior Manager with:
Managing the entire product line life cycle from strategic planning to tactical activities.
Specify market requirements for current and future products by conducting market research supported by on-going visits to customers and other industry stakeholders
Analyze potential partner relationships for the product. 
Set and deliver commercial targets for the product
General 

Understand the competitors’ products in terms of positioning, features and benefits, and account acquisition strategies
Build an excellent knowledge of the CEGBU’s products, mapping how the new product set interfaces to the existing product set. 
Candidate Requirements

Required Skills and Experience

Essential:

Unifier experience strongly preferred.
Experience of developing reports using Oracle BI Publisher strongly preferred.
5+ years product management or technical consulting experience required.
Some SaaS or network-based business expertise
Experience making sophisticated product decisions in a competitive market and getting it right!
Must always be thinking about the customer.  Must be maniacal about focusing on product issues and initiatives that will create engaged and happy users (which ultimately generate revenue).
Have a strong business sense and ability to grasp customer’s needs and expectations. 
Demonstrated ability to gather user requirements and convert them into a winning product vision.
Desirable: 

Experience in Agile/SAFe Development
Experience working in a fast-growing business
Experience with organizations in the never-ending process of transitioning to Agile development methodologies.

Responsibilities :

Configure, maintain and enhance the industry solutions based on Unifier
Develop custom reports and dashboards for industry solutions.
Understand the customer and their needs and is their advocate 
Understand the market, customers and product management strategy and convey these contexts to the team.
Work with your manager for the creation, management and prioritisation of a product backlog, and for assessing what is appropriate to release to market
Communicate with and get buy in from key stakeholders on product strategy, including external (our customers) and internal. Continue to make development, marketing, support and importantly sales and pre-sales feel good about your stream’s offerings and direction.
Make decisions based on specific and deep market and metrics analysis. 
Work with the Senior Manager to measure and report on the success of your solutions, particularly around adoption and satisfaction.
Ensure that what we build adds up to meaningful experiences for our customers
Plan ahead over 3-5 sprints and monitor progress during sprints. Resolve with stakeholder input any ambiguities and conflicts with other existing or new functionality. 
Ensure customer facing departments understand the changes we make to our products  
Gather feedback to improve our solutions 
Be subject matter experts in our products 
Proactively contribute to ongoing process improvement and ensure high quality outcomes for our customers
Review and contribute to user documentation as a part of our release to market processes
Pro-active in helping others through building capability and supporting peers

21)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-ibm-cloud-ecosystem-product-manager-ibm-india-pvt-limited-bengaluru-4-to-9-years-030624906787?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=11&px=2

Job description

Ready to re-imagine the product management role? At IBM, as an Offering Manager, you are responsible for the full lifecycle of an offering: from validating need to determining the business model and defining the solution requirements. Going beyond the traditional focus of timetables and budgets, you use your keen insights into what customers want in their own business plan - and work across disciplines to build the best solutions to a problem. If being the CEO of your offering excites you, consider an offering management career at IBM.

Your Role and Responsibilities
IBM Cloud Ecosystem Product Managers develop strategies and tools to maximize the success of our Ecosystem partners. Our partners span from ISVs (Build Partners), Resellers (Sell Partners) and System Integrators (Service Partners).

Our product managers work with partners to design strategies, execute go to market campaigns and implement the IBM tools required to successfully sell IBM Cloud with these partners.
The PMs work with partners to define business models and contractual structures that describe the different relationships between the partners and IBM
Create and maintain relationship with partners, in particular ISV and resellers
Guide partners through the contractual and onboarding process
Enable partners on the benefits of IBM Cloud and the IBM Cloud Ecosystem
Define business models and go to market strategies with partners
Support partners in the definition and renegotiations of custom agreements
Advocate for partners with key IBM stakeholders (sales teams, product managers, leadership, process and tool owners)
Lead improvements in the IBM Cloud Platform that will benefit partners


Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Working knowledge of IBM Cloud
Familiarity with SaaS business models
Experience in managing partners and clients
Experience with IBM partnership models and processes
Ability to lead cross-functional processes with a structured approach
Communication skills and client/partner focused mentality

22)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-associate-product-manager-tata-nexarc-mumbai-bengaluru-3-to-6-years-281222501560?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=15&px=2
Job description
Your responsibilities will include building product/services focused on solving SMB pain areas on the Tata platform. You will be tasked to closely work on gathering customer requirements, validate concepts by collecting continuous customer feedback and be the champion of customer voice. Convert final features into product requirements and functional specification documents. Work closely with cross functional teams and be able to explain the concept to engineering, sales, marketing and operations teams.

The ideal candidate will be comfortable in a fast-paced, multi-tasked, high energy environment with an ability to deal with ambiguity. Candidate should have a background of digital products for B2B products throughout product lifecycle that enables him or her to drive engagement with respective stakeholders including the Engineering, Sales Marketing and operations teams. format

Develop new product / capabilities based on immense customer understanding with help of continuous consumer insights and market research. Working closely with Engineering team to deliver these products/ offerings

Be the execution expert for the product with cross functional teams

Write self-explanatory requirement document and crisp wireframes

Build required partnerships and alliances for set of product offerings

2-5 years of experience as a Product professional

Experience of digital product for B2B or B2C

Working closely with engineering teams and writing great product specs documents

Proven analytical ability to use customer-centric, data-driven insights to drive decisions

Proven ability to engage, energize, influence and enable large, cross-functional teams

Effective in a highly matrixed, distributed and fast-moving environment.

Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills.

High degree of self-starting initiative and organization.

23)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-principal-product-manager-data-foundation-banking-oracle-bengaluru-10-to-15-years-210524003414?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=19&px=2
Job description
Short description displayed on job tile

Product Manager with hands-on development experience in Data modeling for Financial Services industry

Job description displayed in the job posting

We are seeking aspirational graduates interested in a career in Product Management to join OFSAA Data Management Applications suite. The position will need to perform product requirements and functional design of OFSAA products. Need to interact with customers and other product managers to collect business requirement and translate in data model and functional design.

The work we do is often non-routine and very complex, involving the application of advanced technical/business skills in areas of Banking Domain. We are looking for very hardworking contributors with a passion for learning, self-motivated and independent engineers with a drive to make a difference. Strong analytical and problem solving skills are desirable, as the candidates will be involved in solving complex business issues.

As a Principal Product Manager, you will be responsible for identifying and triaging complex business solutions / issues in Data Management Products. You will be responsible for designing and implementing Deep Analysis Tools to mine data to extract actionable analytics, use AI/ML to identify and resolve anomalies and quickly establish the root cause of issues.

Our Ideal Candidate

Team members are flexible, curiosity filled, self-motivated, proactive, and have an intense desire to achieve excellence.

Should have excellent product management skills
Should have excellent technical skills and presentation abilities and can willing to go that extra mile to attain finesse.
Proactive, willing to take ownership, ability to quickly learn new technologies and take up new tasks and initiatives
Should have excellent problem solving, analytical and technical troubleshooting skills
Experience in working in BFSI Domain and specifically Regulatory Compliance Risk Management is important
Effective verbal and written communication skills.
Collaboration skills with other team members across portfolio
Excellent knowledge of Datawarehousing, data modeling, data lakehouses, ETL etc.
Your Responsibilities

Document the Data model requirements for various subject areas in Risk, Finance and Compliance domains of Banking and Insurance industry.
Product scope and release definition, release planning
Sales and customer demonstrations
Collaborate with pre-sales for POC’s, collateral, proposal reviews.
Review technical design documents.
Review QA validation scenarios
Champion Model Governance standards for entire OFSAA ecosystem.
Your Qualifications

Degree in B.S or equivalent
7 to 10 years of relevant work experience
Excellent knowledge of Data warehousing, Data lakes, Data Governance, Data Integration and various technology stack related to implementation of large data warehouses and data lakes.
Expert and practical knowledge of enterprise data architecture – domain driven design, micro-services, enterprise data integration patterns
Good knowledge of data science and machine learning concepts and practical uses in data management.
Diversity and Inclusion:

An Oracle career can span industries, roles, Countries, and cultures, allowing you to flourish in new roles and innovate while blending work life in. Oracle has thrived through 40+ years of change by innovating and operating with integrity while delivering for the top companies in almost every industry.

To nurture the talent that makes this happen, we are committed to an inclusive culture that celebrates and values diverse insights and perspectives, a workforce that inspires thought leadership and innovation.

Oracle offers a highly competitive suite of Employee Benefits designed on the principles of parity, consistency, and affordability. The overall package includes certain core elements such as Medical, Life Insurance, access to Retirement Planning, and much more. We also encourage our employees to engage in the culture of giving back to the communities where we live and do business.

At Oracle, we believe that innovation starts with diversity and inclusion and to create the future we need talent from various backgrounds, perspectives, and abilities. We ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to successfully participate in the job application, and interview process, and in potential roles. to perform crucial job functions.

That’s why we’re committed to creating a workforce where all individuals can do their best work. It’s when everyone’s voice is heard and valued that we’re inspired to go beyond what’s been done before.

Career Level - IC4

24)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-i-ii-zeta-inc-bengaluru-3-to-5-years-190723501928?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_1&xp=20&px=2
Job description
Tachyon is Cloud Native, Cloud Agnostic, API first core accounting system capable of powering any asset (secured and unsecured credit cards, term loans, mortgage etc) or any liability (saving account, current account) product with focus on both retail and corporate banking.
Youll be working closely with the leadership and the rest of the Zeta product team to define, build and scale one or more of below products:
1. Credit card
2. Core accounting
3. Digital payments

What is the job like
Discovery : Research existing demand, explore the problem space through the lenses of viability, feasibility, usability, customer empathy and ethical assumptions
Get feedback early and often, often co-designing with customers or prospects
Map solutions to specific opportunities
Prioritisation : Apply skills from user science, analytics and business acumen to identify customer and user problems.
Apply the lens of strategy, user goals and Tachyon s purpose to prioritize problems to solve.
Communication : Evangelize and communicate the product plan.
Apply low fidelity design to present vision for solutions to problems.
Collaboration : Collaborate with engineers and designers to arrive at the detailed solutions to problems.
Collaborate with Sales and Customer Success to understand and eliminate obstacles to adoption and usage.
Work with Marketing to bring new features to life on various communication touch points
Execution : Own the roadmap for one or more parts of the product.
Work with engineering and design to plan launch scope. Together with engineering and design, break-down scope into launch iterations
Iteration : Design a customer feedback loop and optimism for customer and business success metrics
Decide what features to change and prioritize iterations based on ROI
Execute strategies that will drive measurable growth in adoption and engagement
Who should apply
At least 3-5 years of experience in product management.
Should have functional understanding of prepaid issuance domain
Should be proficient and have knowledge in working with RESTful APIs
Conduct market research and analysis to identify customer needs, market trends, and competitive landscape in the prepaid services space.
Define and prioritize product requirements based on customer insights, market demands, and business goals
Work closely with the engineering team on the technology development and deployment
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams and influence stakeholders.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and dynamic environment, managing multiple projects and priorities simultaneously.
Experience with agile product development methodologies and product management tools

25)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-phonepe-bengaluru-5-to-7-years-040523500514?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_2&xp=2&px=3
Job description
As the product manager solving growth focused problems, you will own and drive the vision and road map for products driving customer growth for both PhonePe and PhonePe s merchant partners
You will be responsible for evangelizing and executing on the road map
You will work closely with internal and external stakeholders cutting across, business, technology, regulatory and industry
You will be responsible for defining, designing and detailing these growth solutions
You will also be responsible for delivery of the solutions working with cross-functional, distributed teams
Finally, you will be key in helping us maintain our product agility and extend our leadership in delivering innovative growth focused solutions that run reliably at scale
This role will require deep problem-solving acumen as well as strong communication and negotiation skills. Most of all it will require a proven track record of shipping world-class product solutions, preferably in consumer facing products.

Required Skills

Deep understanding of marketing tech stacks, industry trends, technology development and evolving customer needs
Excellent negotiation skills and verbal and written communications skills
Extremely analytical and data driven; ability to derive actionable conclusions from large data sets
Proven customer champion
Proven ability in delivering results in a fast-paced, rapid-growth environment
Team player; ability to interface and build relationships at all levels internally and externally
Experienced in influencing disparate stakeholders and working with cross functional teams across multiple locations and business units
Comfortable with complex technology, analytics and product teams
Atleast 5 years of background in building customer facing products or platform

26)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-senior-product-manager-athenahealth-bengaluru-10-to-16-years-310524010256?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_2&xp=5&px=3
Job description
athenahealth is a progressive and innovation-driven software product company. We partner with healthcare organizations across the care continuum to drive clinical and financial results. Our expert teams build modern technology on an open, connected ecosystem, yielding insights that make a difference for our customers and their patients. We maintain a unique values-driven employee culture and offer a flexible work-life balance. As evidence of our rapid growth and industry leadership, we were recently acquired by Private Equity for $17 billion! and we have many new strategic product initiatives for 2023.
We are headquartered in Boston, US, and our India offices are in Bangalore, Chennai, and Pune.

Position Summary: We are looking for Senior Manager, Product Management for our Consumer Messaging product is part of the Patient Experience product line. Patients today expect convenient, digital interactions in most areas of their life. With patient engagement tools and services, providers can bring that experience to their patients while also reducing the practices workload, using automated messaging services, appointment reminders, and more.   

This role manages the product for a functional area. S/he is the product owner (PO) for a scrum team. The individual is responsible for understanding the customer/market problems, working independently/in collaboration with other PMs to define problem statements and come up with solutions to those problems. This position will work daily within scrum teams defining and writing user stories, prioritizing product backlogs, and making trade-off decisions between scope and schedule.   


The Team:


athenahealthenables healthcare providers (doctors, clinics, hospitals, etc.) to better engage with their patientsthrough a suite of offerings.This includes the patient portal, aself-serveportalfor patients toschedule appointments, access forms and make co-payments online.Automated messaging in form of reminders for upcoming appointments, billing, and follow-up care is anotherkey offering for patient engagement.Consumer Messaging zone based in Bangalore completely owns the roadmap and execution of the automated messaging solution.   


Product Execution


Creates multi-release product roadmaps (multi-release) and communicates internally, noting the stages and timelines for various work.   
Determines whether experiments, alpha, and/or beta stages are needed to determine Product-Market fit and appropriately defines and utilizes them.   
Works with the Product Leadership to prioritize problems or themes to reach the outcomes.   
Defines the outcome for sprints and releases and prioritizes the initiatives for the scrum teams.   
Works with the UX team to identify and understand user problems and requirements.   
Analyzes the scope of the product area and makes decisions about the actions needed on how to proceed to realize the outcomes outlined in the product strategy.   
Conduct analysis for new initiatives; gather information, end-user feedback, and experiments to reduce uncertainty.   
Identifies product gaps and defines requirements to fill these product gaps.   
Works with the developers and designers to build a product that meets the expected outcomes and market needs.   
Works with both UX and Development to understand design or technology implications in solution ideas.   
Build, groom, and prioritize the backlog.   
Articulates crisp user requirements, user stories, and documentation.   
Communicates requirements and constraints and facilitates the team in brainstorming to figure out how to best satisfy the needs of the customer and the business.   
Works with the product leadership to recommend the best course of action to achieve intents.   
Verifies and provides feedback on requirements as delivered to ensure they are solving business problems.   
Gains alignment from multiple stakeholders; recognize the need for alignment.   
Understands product dependencies and negotiate the trade-offs with the appropriate product managers.   
Participates in scrum meetings i.e. daily stand-up, sprint planning, readouts, and retrospective   

Education, Experience, & Skills Required: 


At least 12 to 16 years of work experience with Min 10 years in a Product Management role.    
Min 6 years of professional experience with Software product development   
Experience with Agile development required.   
Bachelor's Degree in engineering. MBA would be an advantage.   
Experience in Marketing & Consumer Engagement Platforms is a plus.   
Experience in Platform, APIs, and Cloud services is a plus   
Should have interacted and worked with US stakeholders.   
Demonstrated success at driving vision and prioritization of products in a dynamic environment using analytic and quantitative capabilities   
Ability to explain your positioning to various people around the company in an effective way 

27)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-product-manager-biesse-india-private-limited-bengaluru-8-to-13-years-280524007397?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_2&xp=6&px=3
Job description
Role & responsibilities

Establish product vision and strategies by working with KAMs to get customer insights, market trends to build and activate the product roadmap in a specific segment
Benchmarks competitors with market research & detailed analysis acts as a market expert for the product.
Document user stories, specifications and product features into a detailed MRD to communicate across teams and ensure mandatory requirements are built accordingly
Prepare a detailed Business case including Scope, Success Criteria, Project Plan, Project Budget with ROI estimation, Product positioning and Go-to-market strategy.
Set project timelines and keep teams on task to complete milestones according to the schedule. Be the gate keeper for all Business and Technical gates.
Quickly recognize business trends and identify opportunity for product upgradation and contingency plans as necessary to protect the business and identify opportunities for cross-regional applications for existing product portfolio.
Define and analyze metrics to measure the success of the products and fine tune product features to ensure market fit of the product

Preferred candidate profile

BE/ B. Tech with minimum 8 years of experience in Product Management preferably in a machine tool industry
Effective communication skills (written & verbal).
Strong data interpretation & data reporting.
Project Management
Strong presentation & problem solving skills

28)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-senior-product-manager-database-platforms-delphix-kolkata-mumbai-new-delhi-hyderabad-pune-chennai-bengaluru-7-to-11-years-180324500216?src=seo_srp&sid=17188537693289671_2&xp=7&px=3
Job description
As a Senior Product Manager at Delphix, you ll work across our organization to find new solutions for our customers and the company. We believe that leadership comes at all levels and we expect all Product Managers to grow into leadership - both by example and across development and product teams. Product Management is both broad (market analysis to product implementation) and deep (data analysis, product knowledge, technical mastery) and we look for those who expect and demand excellence from themselves.

This role will be focused on our flagship Continuous Data product, specifically our database platform support across SQL Server, Postgres, SAP Hana, Cassandra, DB2, CockroachDB, and more. Data is our business and requires us to constantly innovate by onboarding new data sources and expanding the feature sets of existing data sources. Experience with relational and NoSQL databases in a DevOps context is preferred as you will work with experts in this complex domain.
 
Roles & Responsibilities:
Build the product strategy and roadmap for specific Delphix products, informed by customer and market insights, competitive analysis, technical capability, and internal initiatives/assets
Lead and manage the full product lifecycle market analysis, requirements definition, delivery and testing, education, internal business readiness, and customer deployment
Perform in-depth market competitive analysis, and gather customer insights to develop product and competitive positioning
Be an expert on your product, industry, and competition and leverage that expertise to drive product innovation and capture market opportunities
Create and deliver product-specific and thought leadership content including blogs and webinars
Determine product pricing by utilizing market research data, understanding costs, anticipating volume, and pricing custom orders
Establish and execute winning go-to-market strategies and drive successful product adoption in collaboration with Sales, Marketing, Support, and Business Partners
Required Skills & Experience:
Excellent written and verbal skills
Strong proficiency in English is a must
Experience in an enterprise software product management position, ideally in database and DevOps domains
Deep comfort with technical systems
A computer science or other technical degree is not required but is a strong benefit
Able to gather, analyze, and confidently present relevant data
Able to work cross-functionally as a team member and influencer
A desire to push the envelope to improve yourself and your team
Availability to collaborate with global teams and customers across many timezones

29)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3004375-product-manager
The Role
About Us:

At Parafin, our mission is to grow small businesses.

Small businesses are the backbone of our economy, yet banks do not have their back. Parafin is a technology company that builds infrastructure which enables small businesses to get easy access to financial services via platforms they sell on. Parafin's first set of products offer capital-as-a-service for online platforms. Parafin currently powers the capital programs for platforms and payment processors ranging from Series B to post-IPO companies such as DoorDash, Amazon, Worldpay, Mindbody, Fullsteam, Guesty, Xplor, and Quilt.

We are a tight-knit team coming from organizations such as Stripe, Square, Plaid, Coinbase, Robinhood, Affirm, Uber, and CERN, and are excited both about helping small businesses grow and thrive, and build products that leaders at top companies have started to use every day to grow their platforms. We are backed by prominent venture capitalists such as Ribbit Capital, Thrive Capital, GIC, Index Ventures, Green Oaks Capital, and SV Angel and have raised more than $94M in equity and $200M in debt.

About the Position:

We are looking for a Product Manager to partner with Data Science and Finance and own Parafin’s funding decisioning and payments experiences. If you are a self-starter who enjoys solving complex, multi-sided problems, come join us!

What You’ll Be Doing:

Lead strategy, prioritization and execution for Parafin’s Merchant Decisioning team

Partner closely with Data Science, Finance, Product Operations and CX to understand small business problems and business goals.

Partner with engineering, design and content strategy to develop solutions that solve small busines problems while keeping in mind Parafin’s business goals.

Work with the founders to lay out the long-term strategy for the business

What We’re Searching For:

5+ years of fintech product management experience

Strong written and verbal communication skills. Ability to communicate vision and streamline execution across different internal and external teams

Strong product and business sense.

Ability to drive strategic decisions.

Data-driven thinking with experience in data analytics tools.

B2B commercial sense is required

We Prefer If You Have:

Software engineering or technical experience

Experience taking a product from 0 to 1

Experience working with enterprise customers

What We Offer

Salary Range:$200k -$240k

Equity grant

Medical, dental & vision insurance

Unlimited PTO & work from home flexibility

Commuter benefits

Free lunches

Paid parental leave

30)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3029911-product-manager
The Role
Who We Are:
Founded in 2018 by engineers from Stanford, Cisco Meraki, and Samsara, Spot AI is the fastest growing Video Intelligence company in the U.S. We are upending the $30 billion video surveillance market with an AI Camera System to create a safer, smarter physical world via Video Intelligence for every person at work. In the process, we’re disrupting video security to create a new category of Video Intelligence.

We are experiencing tremendous growth and are deployed at thousands of locations across businesses in 17 different verticals, ranging from local businesses to Fortune 500s. Our customers range from warehousing and healthcare to nonprofits and car washes including ExtraSpace Storage, WineDirect, YMCA, and Veg Fresh Farms.

We’ve raised $60M+ in financing to continue to transform how organizations use their video footage. We’re backed by Scale Venture Partners, Redpoint Ventures, Bessemer Venture Partners, StepStone Group, and MVP Ventures.

To learn even more about our product and why our customers love to partner with Spot AI, check out our YouTube channel!

Who You Are:

You are entrepreneurial. You like talking to customers. You like building things. You like shipping things.

You’re a product owner who enjoys taking products from 0 to 1. You are customer-focused, and enjoy engaging with customers directly to validate pain points and needs in order to iterate on our next product features and launches. You have worked in a start-up or high growth company, with both hardware and software products, and have built successful B2B products for mid-market and/or enterprise customers.

If this sounds like you, if you're ready to embark on an extraordinary journey at the intersection of AI, video, and innovation, then you could be the Product Manager we've been searching for. Join us at Spot AI and let's get people excited about the power of video intelligence!

What Excites You:
Owning and building products and features that drive revenue growth and are adopted by thousands of businesses and used daily by thousands more individuals.

Monitoring industry trends and competitive developments in video intelligence, identifying opportunities for differentiation and innovation.
Leading the end-to-end process of bringing new hardware products from initial concept through to launch, ensuring all milestones are met on time and within budget.
Operate your product area like a business unit, with direct accountability for meeting and exceeding revenue targets and other key performance indicators (KPIs).
Proven ability to take products from initial idea to full market launch, focusing on creating value at each step of the product life cycle.
What Gets Our Attention:
Bachelor's or higher degree in a technical or related field.
A minimum of at least four years of experience in a product management role with increasing levels of responsibility.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with the ability to translate complex technical concepts into simple, actionable insights.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to effectively collaborate with diverse stakeholders and build consensus.
Demonstrated leadership capabilities, with the ability to inspire and motivate cross-functional teams towards a shared vision.
Experience working with SaaS products, and with hardware and software products.
Experience working with AI products gets bonus points!
Willingness to work in our San Francisco office at least 3 days per week. (Located near Oracle Park.)
What’s In It For You:
Base Salary Range: $135,000 - $180,000 annually. Spot AI uses multiple factors when determining offered salary, including geographical location within the United States and skill level evaluated during the interview process. Your recruiting partner can provide further details once an interview process has begun.
Generous early stage equity
Medical, dental and vision plan options
401K with Employer Match
Flexible and supportive time off practices, including self-managed PTO and a generous new parent leave policy
Learning and Development Opportunities
Remote work flexibility (2 days per week from home)
What We Value:
We operate under a trio of company values:

Customer First, Always. We are relentlessly curious about our customer’s goals, and seek the simplest solutions to solve their problems.
Own Your Outcomes. We bias towards action, move fast, and iterate. Everyone on our team is empowered to make decisions.
It’s a team effort. We help each other succeed. We leverage each other’s strengths to accomplish big goals together.
And, we are creating and cultivating a diverse and inclusive culture where we celebrate individuals for what they accomplish, no matter who they are! As an equal opportunity employer, we do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

31)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3037808-product-manager
The Role
Steadily is an insurtech that specializes in rental property insurance for landlords. We're 3 years old, 150 people, manage $12B in risk, and are on the way to becoming the biggest and best insurer of rental properties in the US.

We exist to deliver fast, affordable insurance and to pay claims quickly and fairly. To do that, we hire the best for each role to build the experience that we'd want if we were a client.

We’re hiring our second Product Manager to design and build products that our clients love. This role reports to the CEO.

What You’ll Do:

Immerse yourself in our customer persona to find friction anywhere in the journey from initial click to policy signing to claim paid, and fix it.

Embrace UI design and iterate until you've arrived at a magical solution that delights our customers. Figma is our tool of choice.

Analyze customer retention, lifetime value, and customer acquisition cost to identify low-hanging fruit where we can improve the product.

Figure out how to shorten the handle time for support cases and leads, so customers get answers in seconds instead of minutes or hours.

There are far more interesting things to work on then you’ll have time to tackle, so you’ll pick your battles and decide what’s most important?

What You’ll Bring:

Experienced: 4+ years in software product management.

Builder: You have a builder’s mindset and take ideas from inception to launch over and over. You have a bias towards action.

Digital: Your tech savvy is exceptional. You can't necessarily code, but you've read enough code to diagnose a logic bug.

Designer: You've spent a lot of time in Figma with wireframes and mockups so you have a strong design sense for good UI and UX.

Hungry: You want to make the leap into a high-growth tech startup to rapidly accelerate your career.

Compensation:

Total compensation of at least $180K

At least $150K base salary

Equity in the company

Employer healthcare contribution

401K

Health (HSA or FSA), vision, and dental insurance

Location:

Austin, TX (in-office full-time)

33)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3033824-product-manager
The Role
About Laurel & Roadmap

Laurel is the first company to apply AI to tracking time.

Company Roadmap

Phase 1 (today):

Applying AI to automate timesheets for professional services. Value is: (1) more money for the firm and (2) less time for the user
Phase 2 (2025):

Aggregating time data and moving pro serv industries from selling time → selling outcomes (rewiring the incentive model for 20% of Global GDP)
Phase 3: (2030):

Tie outcomes back to the input of time across all digital industries–and leverage our work data set to automate work that does not create leverage
Traction:

Series B ($55M raised from top-tier investors). Rebuilt platform E2E post Series B raise, which launched in Feb 2023. In just 11 months, we’ve gone from $0 → +$5M ARR on the new platform.

Summary of Role

We are hiring a Product Manager who can build the next generation of AI tools to help teams sanctify time. We are looking for extremely entrepreneurial Product Managers to help innovate and execute product initiatives by working seamlessly with teams of engineers, AI/ML, designers, and customer success to build experiences to return time.

You will own end-to-end a significant surface area and will be responsible for strategy, execution, and delivery of short-term and long-term outcomes.

Key Responsibilities:

The ideal candidate is a strong analytical and first principles thinker, who starts with market and customer needs, synthesizes data and customer insights, to build the right experience that resonates with the market.

You possess a proven track record of delivering results, coupled with a humble curiosity that drives you to understand and learn from any misses.

Establish a shared vision across the company by building consensus on priorities leading to product execution
Distill vision and strategy for the team, get all members of the cross-functional team aligned and motivated.
Seek ground-truth. Heavily utilize data insights, market and customer research, and your product intuition to continually improve your domain. Solicit and embrace critical feedback.
Drive product development with a team of world-class engineers and designers
Integrate quant and qual usability studies, research, and market analysis into product requirements to drive market and user adoption
Define and analyze metrics that inform the success of products.
Qualifications and Experience:

5+ years of experience in Product Management, preferably in Enterprise SaaS
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic startup environment.
Strong driver mentality and bias to action.
Proven ability to develop and execute product strategies and roadmap.
Experience using data to solve business problems. Familiar with SQL, Python, or R to analyze data. Ability to interpret data, make data-driven decisions, and articulate trade-offs.
Track record of delivering outcomes.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to work effectively with cross-functional teams.
Bonus Qualifications:

AI Knowledge: Experience setting goals and KPIs for AI algorithms is a bonus.
Knowledge of professional services industries such as Legal, Accounting, and Consulting.
Additional experience in gaming, social, or management consulting.
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Analytics, AI/ML, Physics, MBA or a related field
Compensation: The salary range for this role is $170,000-$230,000. Final salary amounts will be determined based on several factors including candidate skills, expertise, experience and geography.

Flexibility and Logistics:

Location: This role will be based in our company offices in San Francisco or potentially Los Angeles.
Additional Benefits: Comprehensive medical/dental/vision coverage with covered premiums, 401(k), and additional benefits including wellness/commuter/FSA stipends.
Visa Sponsorship: Unfortunately we are unable to sponsor visas at this time.
What happens if my kid or I are sick on a workday? Take all the time you need! We’ll cover for you. And send you some soup.
Laurel's Commitment: We encourage diverse perspectives and rigorous thinkers who aren't afraid to challenge the status quo. Laurel is an equal-opportunity employer committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.

34)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3020278-product-manager
The Role
About OnRamp:
OnRamp is a collaborative onboarding management platform that helps companies provide the best ever onboarding experience to customers and partners. Our primary product is a B2B2B (!) application that serves companies from startups to Fortune 100s across almost all industries.

We have great momentum: a solid product, enthusiastic customers, and a sizable recent round of funding from great VCs. If you have a passion for enabling teams to deliver experiences that change the way work gets done and you’re searching for a career-defining role, we would love to talk.

About The Job:
As a Product Manager at OnRamp, you will play a pivotal role in shaping our direction and success as part of a small team. Reporting to the Head of Engineering, you will collaborate closely across all teams to enable and expedite product innovation and ensure alignment with market needs and business goals.

Core Responsibilities:
Product Management means different things at different companies. The core responsibilities of this role are focused on surfacing insights and facilitating progress, serving as a “glue player” to help us accelerate and improve.

Customer Discovery:

Engage with customers and prospects to uncover unmet needs, pain points, and opportunities for product improvement.
Use customer feedback to inform product decisions and prioritize feature development that drives sustainable growth and differentiation in the market.
Problem Discovery:

Identify key customer problems and jobs to be done through qualitative and quantitative research.
Drive prioritization of problems based on impact and feasibility to drive effective solution discovery.
Solution Discovery:

Work closely with Engineering as they explore and develop innovative solutions that address customer needs and business objectives.
Champion a user-centric approach to product development, ensuring solutions are intuitive and valuable to end-users.
Stakeholder Management:

Build strong relationships with internal stakeholders, including co-founders, sales, marketing, support, engineering, and customer success, to gather input and align priorities.
Communicate product updates and roadmap plans to stakeholders, fostering transparency, buy-in, and excitement.
Backlog Management:

Maintain the product backlog, prioritizing features and enhancements based on customer feedback, business value, and technical feasibility.
Collaborate with the engineering team to ensure timely and efficient delivery of product increments.
Necessary Qualifications:

Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with the ability to assess risks and make data-informed decisions.
Exemplary communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to influence stakeholders and drive consensus.
Minimum 3 years of experience working on SaaS products in roles such as product management, product design, engineering, data analysis, or user research.
Experience working on pre-Product/Market fit teams
Demonstrated understanding of modern product discovery and delivery methodologies.
High comfort level with ambiguity and working on a small team in a fast moving environment.
Join us in shaping the future of our company and making a meaningful impact on how businesses collaborate. If you're passionate about clearing obstacles to drive product innovation and delivering value to customers, we want to hear from you!

35)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3037216-product-manager
The Role
About the role

We are seeking a Product Manager at Netskope’s Santa Clara, CA office.

The base salary offered for this role will begin at $182,333 and up to $205,000. Salary is one part of Netskope’s competitive package. Offers are based on the candidate’s experience and geographic location.

What you will be doing

Drive product vision, strategy, and roadmap for company data protection, security and compliance products to foster growth, innovation, and customer success.
Ensure alignment with the overall product and company vision.
Be an expert on the domain, market, and trends.
Ability to evangelize that vision constantly so that all stakeholders are aligned, have context, and understand where we are going.
Clearly articulate business goals, target use cases, and product requirements.
Set quantitative business/technical metrics and success criteria for your product, and track how executing against set roadmap progress towards achieving these.
Develop deep and trusted relationships with key customers, partners, analysts, and other key internal and external stakeholders.
May telecommute.
Required skills and experience

3 years of experience in the job offered or in an engineer-related occupation
Position requires at least 3 years of experience in each of the following skills:
Defining advanced analytics strategy and roadmap and, as well as working with TDIR (Threat Detection & Incident Response);
Utilizing Python, Mongodb, Neo4j and other graph-based technologies to create various threat detection PoCs;
Leading research for MITRE ATT&CK framework, working on TTPs, and utilizing massive datasets to build high fidelity detection rules; and
Hunting major threat actors (APT3, APT29, APT28, FIN7) and analyzing their entry points, abnormal behavior & patterns, and leveraging TTPs that can help in detection.
Required Education

Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Management or related field

36)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3029911-product-manager
The Role
Who We Are:
Founded in 2018 by engineers from Stanford, Cisco Meraki, and Samsara, Spot AI is the fastest growing Video Intelligence company in the U.S. We are upending the $30 billion video surveillance market with an AI Camera System to create a safer, smarter physical world via Video Intelligence for every person at work. In the process, we’re disrupting video security to create a new category of Video Intelligence.

We are experiencing tremendous growth and are deployed at thousands of locations across businesses in 17 different verticals, ranging from local businesses to Fortune 500s. Our customers range from warehousing and healthcare to nonprofits and car washes including ExtraSpace Storage, WineDirect, YMCA, and Veg Fresh Farms.

We’ve raised $60M+ in financing to continue to transform how organizations use their video footage. We’re backed by Scale Venture Partners, Redpoint Ventures, Bessemer Venture Partners, StepStone Group, and MVP Ventures.

To learn even more about our product and why our customers love to partner with Spot AI, check out our YouTube channel!

Who You Are:

You are entrepreneurial. You like talking to customers. You like building things. You like shipping things.

You’re a product owner who enjoys taking products from 0 to 1. You are customer-focused, and enjoy engaging with customers directly to validate pain points and needs in order to iterate on our next product features and launches. You have worked in a start-up or high growth company, with both hardware and software products, and have built successful B2B products for mid-market and/or enterprise customers.

If this sounds like you, if you're ready to embark on an extraordinary journey at the intersection of AI, video, and innovation, then you could be the Product Manager we've been searching for. Join us at Spot AI and let's get people excited about the power of video intelligence!

What Excites You:
Owning and building products and features that drive revenue growth and are adopted by thousands of businesses and used daily by thousands more individuals.

Monitoring industry trends and competitive developments in video intelligence, identifying opportunities for differentiation and innovation.
Leading the end-to-end process of bringing new hardware products from initial concept through to launch, ensuring all milestones are met on time and within budget.
Operate your product area like a business unit, with direct accountability for meeting and exceeding revenue targets and other key performance indicators (KPIs).
Proven ability to take products from initial idea to full market launch, focusing on creating value at each step of the product life cycle.
What Gets Our Attention:
Bachelor's or higher degree in a technical or related field.
A minimum of at least four years of experience in a product management role with increasing levels of responsibility.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with the ability to translate complex technical concepts into simple, actionable insights.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to effectively collaborate with diverse stakeholders and build consensus.
Demonstrated leadership capabilities, with the ability to inspire and motivate cross-functional teams towards a shared vision.
Experience working with SaaS products, and with hardware and software products.
Experience working with AI products gets bonus points!
Willingness to work in our San Francisco office at least 3 days per week. (Located near Oracle Park.)
What’s In It For You:
Base Salary Range: $135,000 - $180,000 annually. Spot AI uses multiple factors when determining offered salary, including geographical location within the United States and skill level evaluated during the interview process. Your recruiting partner can provide further details once an interview process has begun.
Generous early stage equity
Medical, dental and vision plan options
401K with Employer Match
Flexible and supportive time off practices, including self-managed PTO and a generous new parent leave policy
Learning and Development Opportunities
Remote work flexibility (2 days per week from home)
What We Value:
We operate under a trio of company values:

Customer First, Always. We are relentlessly curious about our customer’s goals, and seek the simplest solutions to solve their problems.
Own Your Outcomes. We bias towards action, move fast, and iterate. Everyone on our team is empowered to make decisions.
It’s a team effort. We help each other succeed. We leverage each other’s strengths to accomplish big goals together.
And, we are creating and cultivating a diverse and inclusive culture where we celebrate individuals for what they accomplish, no matter who they are! As an equal opportunity employer, we do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

37)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3028278-product-manager
The Role
Movable Ink scales content personalization for marketers through data-activated content generation and AI decisioning. The world’s most innovative brands rely on Movable Ink to maximize revenue, simplify workflow and boost marketing agility. Headquartered in New York City with close to 600 employees, Movable Ink serves its global client base with operations throughout North America, Central America, Europe, Australia, and Japan.

As a Product Manager on our Studio team you will bring the customer point of view to everything, so we build and deliver solutions that our customers love. You will help drive innovation and create the future of our Studio product. You’ll be joining a growing team at an exciting time at Movable Ink. You will collaborate across product, engineering, design to create a product roadmap that delights customers and grows our business.

Responsibilities:

Bring the customer POV to everything we do in Engineering, Product and Design
Create a high value roadmap with your partners in engineering and design that aligns with our business goals and helps us achieve our product vision
Write use cases and user stories to build a shared understanding around user needs and the definition of success
Prioritize upcoming sprints, features, and enhancements in the backlog
Inform decisions with qualitative and quantitative data
Define & track key performance indicators (KPIs) to measure & continually iterate features & functionality
Identify and solve problems across teams and disciplines by partnering with other product managers, Program Management, and GTM teams
Qualifications:

Familiarity with B2C marketing in email or mobile is a must
3+ years experience in Product Management or comparable role
Ability to communicate with technical and non-technical audiences
Can confidently demo product and manage conversations with customers and stakeholders
Demonstrated ability to drive through complexity to achieve results
The base pay range for this position is $130,000-160,000/year USD, which can include additional on-target commission pay/bonus. The base pay offered may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Stock options and other incentive pay may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, depending on the position ultimately offered.

Studies have shown that women, communities of color, and historically underrepresented people are less likely to apply to jobs unless they meet every single qualification. We are committed to building a diverse and inclusive culture where all Inkers can thrive. If you’re excited about the role but don’t meet all of the abovementioned qualifications, we encourage you to apply. Our differences bring a breadth of knowledge and perspectives that makes us collectively stronger.

We welcome and employ people regardless of race, color, gender identity or expression, religion, genetic information, parental or pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, ethnicity, family or marital status, physical and mental ability, political affiliation, disability, Veteran status, or other protected characteristics. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer.

38)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/2823290-product-manager
Product Manager- Become A Member of an Innovative Growth Team
Fresh Prints is an NYC-based custom apparel company. We find incredible students and give them the working capital, training, and support to build the business at their schools. We have 500+ students who will do $30+ million in sales over the next 12 months.

You’ll be focused on the next $100 million. What are our team's tech needs? What do our customers want? How can we tackle those via tech? How do we build products to increase returns or lower OPEX and COGs? How do we usher in the next stage at Fresh Prints?

You’ll work on those questions and many more with the other members of our cross-functional Growth team. As our Product Manager, you'll have plenty of room for experimentation, making mistakes, learning from them, building a vision, and impacting business.

As Fresh Prints grows, you will too. For the right person, this role offers an uncapped opportunity.

Responsibilities

Product Strategy: Develop and communicate a clear product vision and strategy that aligns
with the company's goals and objectives.
Market Research: Conduct market research to identify customer needs, industry trends, and
competitive landscape. Use data-driven insights to inform product decisions.
Product Roadmap: Create and maintain a detailed product roadmap, prioritizing features
and enhancements based on business value and customer feedback.
Cross-functional Collaboration: Work closely with engineering, design, marketing, and
sales teams to ensure seamless product development and launch.
User-Centric Design: Advocate for a user-centric approach to product development,
ensuring our solutions are intuitive and meet user needs.
Product Development: Lead product development efforts, including defining product
requirements, creating user stories, and overseeing development sprints.
Launch and Go-to-Market: Develop go-to-market strategies and collaborate with
marketing and sales teams to successfully launch new products and features.
Product Performance: Continuously monitor product performance, gather user feedback,
and iterate on products to drive improvement.
Metrics and KPIs: Define and track key performance indicators (KPIs) to measure the
success of products and make data-driven decisions.
Requirements

Bachelor's degree in business, engineering, or a related field (MBA preferred).
3+ years of proven experience as a Product Manager in the eComm industry.
Strong understanding of product development methodologies (Agile, Scrum, etc.).
Excellent project management and organizational skills.
Exceptional communication and interpersonal abilities.
Data-driven decision-making skills.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and agile environment.
Benefits

Health Insurance
The opportunity to learn a lot rapidly
Working with a talented and smart team dedicated to building a business together
Working Hours

Monday - Friday, 2:00 PM to 11:00 PM IST

39) 
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3036217-product-manager
The Role
EduFund is looking for an experienced and self-driven Product Manager to join our team!

In this role, your responsibility will be to eat, breathe, and sleep the consumer's needs.

You will mainly be responsible for planning, developing, implementing and monitoring the overall product strategies. This is an exciting role for anyone looking to shape the future of a fast growing start up.

Key Responsibilities:

Lead and inspire cross-functional teams, including product, engineering, and design, to create exceptional products that meet user needs and business objectives.
Define and drive the product vision and strategy, aligning it with the company's overall goals and values.
Collaborate closely with engineering to ensure the successful development and delivery of products.
Champion user-centered design principles and ensure that design and user experience are at the core of our product development process.
Continuously monitor market trends and customer feedback to identify opportunities and challenges.
Make data-driven decisions and track the performance of our products, making improvements as necessary.
Establish a culture of innovation and continuous improvement within the product teams.
Foster collaboration, creativity, and a strong sense of ownership within the teams.
Requirements:

3 years plus experience in product management, with a proven track record of building successful products.
Background in product-based companies will be added advantage.
Strong experience working with cross-functional teams, including engineering, design, and tech.
Proven ability to define and execute a product strategy, taking into account market research, user feedback, and business goals.
Data-driven mindset with a strong analytical and problem-solving ability.
Excellent communication and presentation skills.
Bachelor's or Master's degree in a relevant field is preferred
What you can expect in return:
ESOPs based on performance
Health insurance
Statutory benefits like PF & Gratuity
Flexible Working structure
Professional development opportunities
Collaborative and inclusive work culture

Who we are
EduFund is an early-stage platform that helps Indian parents plan for their child's higher education in advance. Our product allows families to invest for education, take education loans, and receive competitive scholarships! We were founded in 2020 by Eela Dubey (NYU 13’) and Arindam Sengupta (Princeton 12’).

EduFund team is filled with chai lovers, problem solvers, ridiculous jokes, and immeasurable passion towards our work. Our founding team has had the privilege of working at companies like Reliance, Goldman Sachs, CRISIL, GradRight, LeverageEdu, HDFC, and many others.

We have raised over $5M in funding from notable investors such as MassMutual Ventures, Kunal Shah, and DSP Investment Managers.

We are headquartered in Ahmedabad, with teams in Mumbai and Pune.

Website - https://www.edufund.in/

Here’s a taste of what it is like to work at EduFund: https://bit.ly/3t5hLpd

40)
link = https://wellfound.com/jobs/3028196-product-manager
The Role
Product @ JOOR:

The Mobile Product Manager position at JOOR is an individual contributor role for experienced product individuals who are passionate about delighting users while delivering value to the business. You will collaborate with a cross-functional team and product peers to develop strategic product roadmaps that ensure a holistic end-to-end user experience. You will build business cases, articulate strategy, and evangelize the mobile product vision to stakeholders and cross-functional team members. You will measure and report on the efficacy of your initiatives and develop action plans accordingly. You will make hard, high-stakes trade-offs between features, choosing those that are most likely to ensure that both business goals and user needs are met.

We look for candidates who can demonstrate a history of delivering outcomes through a partnership with design, engineering and the business. Someone who, as an excellent storyteller, can represent the interests of the users they serve and influence teams to generate the outcomes that resolve their most pressing problems. We look for candidates who are collaborative by nature, empathetic to users, and are most likely to garner the trust of the stakeholders they serve.

What You'll Do:

Work closely with cross functional team of stakeholders, end-users, engineers, UX designers and product leaders to help develop a product strategy for mobile capabilities
Become the expert for the mobile applications, demonstrating mastery with an understanding of gaps that inform their near-term product roadmap and contribute to long-term strategy
Employ a variety of product discovery methods to collect quantitative and qualitative data to inform product priorities and decisions
Translate insights from product discovery methods into hypotheses with a working iterative plan to identify the right solution to move the needle for customers.
Define features and requirements for projects, manage project plans, and execute product release strategies, ensuring the readiness of the various business partners

Capable of communicating the vision and value of a project while obtaining alignment with stakeholders, aligning team and partners on goals and definition of success
Iterate and deliver on projects for the mobile roadmap while also prioritizing various maintenance and modernization efforts in partnership with engineering to ensure stability and performance of mobile applications.
Tracks industry trends, solutions, competitive offerings to ensure JOOR is leveraging the most useful and modern mobile technologies
Understand tradeoffs in technical choices and make decisions incorporating them
Manage expectations by understanding when initiatives are at risk and proactively communicating
We would LOVE to hear from you:

3+ years of relevant mobile product experience
Understanding of the landscape of problems and quickly zeros in on the best strategy to achieve business outcomes
Excellent Storyteller
Demonstrates expertise in a variety of product discovery techniques
Looks beyond the obvious and doesn't stop at the first solution proposed
Makes choices about priorities that clearly demonstrate an understanding of the business goals, market demand and user needs
Ability to measure product health and use data to inform prioritization decisions, to ensure product quality and service levels, and meet defined goals and success metrics
Can effectively cope with change and can shift gears comfortably
What We Offer:

Target Compensation Range:
Private health insurance
Fully remote w/ WeWork available for optional in-office use
Regular social events, including happy hours, lunch & learns, company off-sites, Meetups
Transparency into the state of our business via quarterly all-hands meetings, showcasing the company's performance in relation to revenue and growth
The product manager will take into consideration a holistic view of the customer's interactions across the customer journey in order to deliver delightful, frictionless and consistent interactions
